indomorph/hin/punc.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
Punct

LEXICON Root
COMMA:, Punct ;
। Punct ;
%? Punct ;
%/ Punct ;
%\ Punct ;
%| Punct ;
%( Punct ;
%) Punct ;
%! Punct ;
%@ Punct ;
%# Punct ;
%$ Punct ;
%% Punct ;
%^ Punct ;
%& Punct ;
%* Punct ;
%& Punct ;
%- Punct ;
%_ Punct ;
%= Punct ;
%| Punct ;
%~ Punct ;
%` Punct ;

LEXICON Punct
+Punct:0 # ;
